Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB79.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Centralized employee" means an employee of the:
1. Executive branch of state government in a position that provides
services necessary for the functioning of the executive branch of state
government as determined by the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet;
2. Judicial branch of state government in a position that provides
services necessary for the functioning of the judicial branch of state
government as determined by the director of the Administrative Office
of the Courts; or
3. Legislative branch of state government in a position that provides
services necessary for the functioning of the legislative branch of state
government as determined by the director of the Legislative Research
Commission;
(b) "Noncentralized employee" means any employee of the:
1. Executive branch of state government;
2. Judicial branch of state government; or
3. Legislative branch of state government;
who has been determined by the secretary or director, as applicable, not to
be a centralized employee under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) "Telework" means to use the internet, email, or telephone to perform work
duties at a location other than an assigned primary work station.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an employee of the
executive branch of state government shall not be permitted to telework
Page 1 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
unless the Governor declares an emergency.
(b) When the Governor declares an emergency and he or she decides that
employees of the executive branch of state government should be allowed to
telework during the emergency, he or she shall specifically state that
teleworking is permitted during the emergency and list which employees
shall be permitted to telework.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an employee of the
judicial branch of state government shall not be permitted to telework
unless the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court declares an emergency.
(b) When the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court declares an emergency and
he or she decides that employees of the judicial branch of state government
should be allowed to telework during the emergency, he or she shall
specifically state that teleworking is permitted during the emergency and list
which employees shall be permitted to telework.
(4) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an employee of the
legislative branch of state government shall not be permitted to telework
unless the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the
Senate jointly declare an emergency.
(b) When the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the
Senate jointly declare an emergency, and they decide that employees of the
legislative branch of state government should be allowed to telework during
the emergency, they shall specifically state that teleworking is permitted
during the emergency and list which employees shall be permitted to
telework.
(5) (a) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, director of the Administrative
Office of the Courts, or the director of the Legislative Research Commission
may approve a policy allowing for up to two (2) days per month of telework
Page 2 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
for noncentralized employees of their respective branches of government.
(b) Any day in which an emergency has been declared pursuant to subsection
(2), (3), or (4) of this section shall also be counted as a telework day
permitted under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall approve the classification of every
noncentralized employee of the executive branch.
(7) This section shall not apply to any of the following:
(a) Justices of the Supreme Court;
(b) Employees of the Department of Kentucky State Police;
(c) Any employee of state government involved in any of the following
professions:
1. Motor vehicle enforcement;
2. Plumbing inspections;
3. Health inspections; and
4. Building inspections;
(d) Any employee of state government whose job responsibilities require them
to be away from their primary work station at least fifty percent (50%) of the
time; or
(e) Any employee of state government whose primary responsibilities involve
developing, implementing, and managing information technology systems
whose job responsibilities require them to telework or who has been
permitted to telework as part of their employment contract.
(8) This section shall not preclude or be construed to preclude any branch of state
government from complying with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42
U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended.
Section 2. KRS 18A.005 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:
Page 3 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(1) "Appointing authority" means the agency head or any person whom he or she has
authorized by law to designate to act on behalf of the agency with respect to
employee appointments, position establishments, payroll documents, register
requests, waiver requests, requests for certification, or other position actions. Such
designation shall be in writing and signed by both the agency head and his or her
designee. Prior to the exercise of appointing authority, such designation shall be
filed with the secretary;
(2) "Base salary or wages" means the compensation to which an employee is entitled
under the salary schedules adopted pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.030 and
18A.110. Base salary or wages shall be adjusted as provided under the provisions of
KRS 18A.355 and 48.130;
(3) "Board" means the Personnel Board created by KRS 18A.045;
(4) "Career employee" means a state employee with sixteen (16) or more years of
permanent full-time state service, or the part-time employment equivalent of at least
sixteen (16) years of full-time state service. The service may have been in the
classified service under this chapter, the unclassified service in the executive branch
of state government, or a combination thereof. At least five (5) years of the
combined service shall have been in the classified service under this chapter;
(5) "Certification" means the referral of the name of one (1) or more qualified
prospective employees by the secretary on request of an appointing officer for
consideration in filling a position in the classified service;
(6) "Class" means a group of positions sufficiently similar as to duties performed,
scope of discretion and responsibility, minimum requirements of training,
experience, or skill, and such other characteristics that the same title, the same tests
of fitness, and the same schedule of compensation have been or may be applied to
each position in the group;
(7) "Classified employee" means an employee appointed to a position in the classified
Page 4 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
service under this chapter whose appointment and employment are subject to the
classified service provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations
promulgated under this chapter;
(8) "Classified position" means a position in the executive branch of state government
that is not exempt from the classified service under KRS Chapter 16, KRS 18A.115,
KRS Chapter 151B, or any other provision of law;
(9) "Classified service" includes all the employment subject to the terms of this chapter
except for those positions expressly cited in KRS 18A.115; a "classified position" is
a position in the classified service;
(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet as provided for in KRS
18A.015;
(11) "Demotion" means a change in the rank of an employee from a position in one (1)
class to a position in another class having a lower minimum salary range and less
discretion or responsibility;
(12) "Cabinet" means the Personnel Cabinet provided for in KRS 18A.015, unless the
context indicates otherwise;
(13) "Eligible" refers to a person who has made a passing score on any examination
required under KRS 18A.005[18A.010] to 18A.200 or 18A.201 or who has
qualified to be placed on a register;
(14) "Employee" means a person regularly appointed to a position in the state service for
which he or she is compensated on a full-time, part-time, intern, or interim basis;
(15) "Federally funded time-limited employee" means an employee in the unclassified
service, appointed to a position that is funded one hundred percent (100%) by a
federal grant or grants. An employee appointed to a federally funded time-limited
position shall be required to meet the minimum requirements for the classification
in which he or she is hired and, subject to the provisions of KRS 18A.113, shall
serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority during a period of time that shall
Page 5 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
not exceed the life of the federal grant that funds the position. A federally funded
time-limited employee who has been aggrieved by notice of disciplinary action or
termination, other than an action based on expiration of the federal grant funding,
may petition the appointing authority of the agency for the opportunity to be heard
by the appointing authority or his or her designee prior to the effective date of the
disciplinary action or termination. The decision of the appointing authority shall be
final except as provided by KRS 18A.095(11)[(14)] and 18A.140. A federally
funded time-limited employee shall not have the right of appeal to the Personnel
Board except as provided by KRS 18A.095(11)[(14)] and 18A.140;
(16) "Federally funded position" means a full-time or a part-time position in which the
unclassified employee is eligible for benefits at the same level as a classified
employee in a permanent position;
(17) "Full-time employee" means an employee in a full-time position;
(18) "Full-time position" means a position, other than an intern or interim position,
requiring an employee to work at least thirty-seven and one-half (37.5) hours in a
work week, except for the following:
(a) Positions in the state parks, where the work assigned is dependent upon
fluctuations in tourism, may be assigned work hours from twenty-five (25)
hours per week during the off seasons and remain in full-time positions; and
(b) Positions in health care facilities, which regularly involve three (3)
consecutive days of twelve (12) hour shifts to cover weekends, shall be
considered full-time;
(19) "Initial probation" means the period of service following initial appointment to any
position under KRS 18A.005[18A.010] to 18A.200 or 18A.201 which requires
special observation and evaluation of an employee's work and which must be
passed successfully before status may be conferred as provided in KRS 18A.110
and by the provisions of this chapter. If the appointee is granted leave in excess of
Page 6 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
twenty (20) consecutive work days during this period, his or her initial probation
shall be extended for the same length of time as the granted leave to cover such
absence;
(20) "Interim employee" means an unclassified employee without status who has been
appointed to an interim position that shall be less than nine (9) months duration;
(21) "Interim position" means a position established to address a one-time or recurring
need of less than nine (9) months duration and exempt from the classified service
under KRS 18A.115;
(22) "Intern employee" means an unclassified employee who has been appointed to
an intern position in a cabinet-approved internship program and who is eligible
for benefits and service credit at the same level as an interim employee;
(23) "Intern position" means a position established to employ a student who is eligible
to participate in a cabinet-approved internship program;
(24) "Part-time employee" means an employee in a part-time position;
(25)[(23)] "Part-time position" means a position, other than an intern or interim
position, requiring an employee to work less than one hundred (100) hours per
month;
(26)[(24)] "Position" means an office or employment in an agency (whether part-time,
full-time, intern, or interim, occupied, or vacant) involving duties requiring the
services of one (1) person;
(27)[(25)] "Promotion" means a change of rank of an employee from a position in one
(1) class to a position in another class having a higher minimum salary or carrying a
greater scope of discretion or responsibility;
(28)[(26)] "Promotional probation" means the period of service, consistent with the
length of the initial probationary period, following the promotion of an employee
with status which must be successfully completed in order for the employee to
retain the position to which he or she has been promoted. If the employee is granted
Page 7 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
leave in excess of twenty (20) consecutive work days during this period, his or her
promotional probation shall be extended for the same length of time as the granted
leave to cover such absence;
(29)[(27)] "Qualifying" means the selection method type which results when the
knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary for a job classification cannot be
accurately measured by written examination;
(30)[(28)] "Reallocation" means the correction of the classification of an existing
position by placement of the position into the classification that is appropriate for
the duties the employee has been and shall continue to perform;
(31)[(29)] "Reclassification" shall mean the change in the classification of an employee
when a material and permanent change in the duties or responsibilities of that
employee has been assigned in writing by the appointing authority;
(32)[(30)] "Reemployment" shall mean the rehiring of an employee with status who has
been laid off;
(33)[(31)] "Reemployment register" means the separate list of names of persons who
have been separated from state service by reason of layoff. Reemployment registers
shall be used as provided by the provisions of KRS 18A.110, 18A.130, and
18A.135;
(34)[(32)] "Register" means any official list of eligibles for a particular class and, except
as provided in this chapter, placed in rank order according to the examination scores
maintained for use in making original appointments or promotions to positions in
the classified service;
(35)[(33)] "Reinstatement" means the privilege of restoration of an employee who has
resigned in good standing at the option of the appointing authority, or who has been
ordered reinstated by the board or a court to a position in his former class, or to a
position of like status and pay;
(36)[(34)] "Reversion" means either the returning of a status employee to his or her last
Page 8 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
position held in the classified service, if vacant, or the returning of a status
employee to a vacant position in the same or similar job classification as his or her
last position held in the classified service. Reversion occurs after a career employee
is terminated other than for cause from the unclassified service or after a status
employee fails to successfully complete promotional probation. Reversion after
unsuccessful completion of promotional probation, or in the case of a career
employee after termination from the unclassified service, may only be appealed to
the Personnel Board under KRS 18A.095(11);
(37)[(35)] "Seniority" means the total number of months of state service;
(38)[(36)] "Status" means the acquisition of tenure with all rights and privileges granted
by the provisions of this chapter after satisfactory completion of the initial
probationary period by an employee in the classified service; and
(39)[(37)] "Transfer" means a movement of any employee from one (1) position to
another of the same grade having the same salary ranges, the same level of
responsibility within the classified service, and the same salary received
immediately prior to transfer.
Section 3. KRS 18A.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary may from time to time designate in writing an employee of the
cabinet to act for him in case of his absence or inability from any cause to discharge
the powers and duties of his position. In this case, the powers and duties of the
secretary shall devolve upon his designee.
(2) The secretary may request appropriate persons, including officers and employees in
the state service, to assist in the preparation and rating of tests. Department heads
shall cooperate to the fullest extent possible in making the services of their
employees available for such work.
(3) (a) The secretary may enter into written agreements with an appointing authority
which would provide for the delegation of his authority and power to the
Page 9 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
appointing authority. The secretary is prohibited from delegating any powers
or authority pertaining to disciplinary actions, lay-offs, or registers.
(b) All written agreements delegating the secretary's power and authority as
provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be specific in nature and
renewed annually.
(c) A copy of the written agreements shall be forwarded to the Personnel Board.
[(4) The secretary shall serve ex officio as a member of the board of trustees of the
Kentucky Employees Retirement System.]
Section 4. KRS 18A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Any person serving on the board on July 15, 1982, shall serve until the expiration
of his current term of office. Subsequent ]Appointments to the board shall be for a
term of four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for which his or her
predecessor was appointed as provided in subsection[subsections] (2)[ and (3)] of
this section, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy prior to the expiration
of such term shall be appointed in the same manner as provided in KRS 18A.045
and for the remainder of such term.
(2) [Upon the expiration of the terms of office of the two (2) board members whose
terms expire January 1, 1984, the Governor shall appoint two (2) members from a
list of four (4) names submitted by the Legislative Research Commission.
Thereafter, upon the expiration of these terms, such terms shall be filled in the same
manner as provided in this subsection.
(3) Upon the expiration of the terms of office, of the members whose terms expire
December 31, 1982, January 1, 1985, and January 1, 1986, ]The Governor shall
appoint five (5) citizens at large who are not associated with state government in
any manner. Thereafter upon the expiration of these terms, such terms shall be
filled in the same manner as provided in this subsection.
(3)[(4)] These five (5) appointments to the board shall be subject to confirmation by
Page 10 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
the Senate. If the Senate is not in session, these five (5) appointments shall be
subject to review by the Interim Joint Committee on State Government which shall
hold a public hearing and shall transmit its recommendations to the Senate.
(4)[(5)] The initial election of classified employees to the board shall be held as
provided in KRS 18A.0551. The two (2) classified employees[ initially] elected to
the board shall serve[ until July 1, 1986. Subsequent elections shall be] for a term of
four (4) years from the date of expiration of the term for which his or her
predecessor was elected. If a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of such term,
the board shall fill the vacancy as provided in KRS 18A.060.
(5)[(6)] If an elected board member separates from the classified service, the member
shall immediately vacate his or her position on the board, or his or her
membership shall be terminated by the board,[accepts an unclassified position
with state government, his membership on the board shall be terminated
immediately] and the vacancy shall be filled as provided in KRS 18A.060.
(6)[(7)] If an elected board member accepts a classified position in a cabinet
employing another board member or if, through no fault of his or her own, he or
she is placed in that cabinet, his or her membership on the board shall not be
terminated for the remainder of his term.
Section 5. KRS 18A.0751 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the
classified service governing:
(a) Appeals by state employees;
(b) Demotion;
(c) Dismissal;
(d) [Fines, ]Suspensions[,] and other disciplinary measures;
(e) Probation, provided that the board may not require an initial probationary
period in excess of six (6) months except as provided in subsection (4)(d)[(e)]
Page 11 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
of this section and KRS 18A.005;
(f) Promotion;
(g) Reinstatement;
(h) Transfer; and
(i) Employee grievances and complaints.
(2) (a) [These ]Administrative regulations promulgated by the board shall comply
with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, and shall have the
force and effect of law, when approved by the board, after compliance with
the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A and the procedures adopted
thereunder.[;]
(b) Administrative regulations promulgated by the board shall not expand or
restrict rights granted to, or duties imposed upon, employees and
administrative bodies by the provisions of this chapter.[; and]
(c) No administrative body, other than the personnel board, shall promulgate
administrative regulations governing the subject matters specified in this
section.
(3) Prior to filing an administrative regulation with the Legislative Research
Commission, the board shall submit the administrative regulation to the secretary
for review:
(a) The secretary shall review the administrative regulation proposed by the board
not more than twenty (20) days after its submission to him or her;
(b) Not more than five (5) days after his review, the secretary shall submit his or
her recommendations in writing to the board;
(c) The board shall review the recommendations of the secretary and may revise
the proposed administrative regulation as it deems necessary; and
(d) After the board has completed the review provided for in this section, it may
file the proposed administrative regulation with the Legislative Research
Page 12 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
Commission pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) These administrative regulations shall provide:
(a) For the procedures to be utilized by the board in the conduct of hearings by
the board, consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) For reduction in rank or grade as provided by this chapter;
(c) For discharge, as provided by this section;
(d) [For imposition, as disciplinary measures, of a fine of not more than ten (10)
working days' pay, or for suspension from the service without pay for no
longer than thirty (30) working days and, in accordance with the provisions of
KRS 18A.095, for the manner of notification of the employee of the discipline
and his or her right of appeal;
(e) ]That no probationary period may exceed twelve (12) months, except as
provided in this paragraph and KRS 18A.005. The secretary may
recommend an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months for
specific job classifications to the board. This recommendation shall take the
form of a proposed administrative regulation that shall be submitted to the
board for approval. The subject of the administrative regulation shall be
limited to job classifications for which an initial probationary period in excess
of six (6) months is required and shall specify:
1. The job classification for which an initial probationary period in excess
of six (6) months is required; and
2. The specific number of months constituting the initial probationary
period for the job classification. No other administrative regulation shall
include any provision prescribing an initial probationary period in
excess of six (6) months, except as provided in KRS 18A.005. Upon
approval by the board of the proposed administrative regulation
provided for in this paragraph, the board shall file the regulation with
Page 13 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
the Legislative Research Commission as provided by KRS Chapter 13A;
(e)[(f)] For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to the
applicant's qualifications, record of performance, conduct, and seniority.
Except as provided by this chapter, vacancies shall be filled by promotion
whenever practicable and in the best interest of the service;
[(g) For reemployment of laid-off employees in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter;]
(f)[(h)] For transfer from a position in one (1) department to a similar position
in another department involving similar qualifications, duties, responsibilities,
and salary ranges as provided by the provisions of KRS 18A.113;
(g)[(i)] For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and
complaints. This plan shall not restrict rights granted employees by the
provisions of this chapter;
(h)[(j)] For promotion of career employees to positions in the unclassified
service without loss of status to the individual employees so promoted, as
provided by this chapter; and
(i)[(k)] For any other administrative regulations not inconsistent with this
chapter and KRS Chapter 13A as may be proper and necessary for its
enforcement.
Section 6. KRS 18A.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A classified employee with status shall not be dismissed, demoted, suspended
without pay, or involuntarily transferred except for cause.
(2) Prior to dismissal, a classified employee with status shall be notified in writing of
the intent to dismiss him or her. The notice shall also state:
(a) The specific reasons for dismissal, including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the intent to dismiss is based;
Page 14 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
3. The date and place of such action or activity; and
4. The names of the parties involved;
(b) That the employee has the right to appear personally, or with counsel if he or
she has retained counsel, to reply to the appointing authority or his or her
designee; and
(c) Whether the employee is placed on administrative leave by the appointing
authority with pay upon receiving the intent to dismiss letter prior to the
agency's final action.
(3) The Personnel Cabinet shall prescribe and distribute a pretermination form to be
completed and forwarded by an employee who wishes to appear before the
appointing authority or his or her designee. The form shall be attached to every
notice of intent to dismiss and shall contain written instructions explaining:
(a) The right granted an employee under the provisions of this section relating to
pretermination hearings; and
(b) The time limits and procedures to be followed by all parties in pretermination
hearings.
(4) No later than five (5) working days after receipt of the notice of intent to dismiss,
excluding the day he or she receives the notice, the employee may request to
appear[,] personally, or with counsel if he or she has retained counsel, to reply to
the appointing authority or his or her designee.
(5) Unless agreed to by the appointing authority or his or her designee and the
employee, the appearance shall be scheduled within six (6) working days after
receipt of an employee's request to appear before the appointing authority or his or
her designee, excluding the day his or her request is received.
(6) No later than five (5) working days after the employee appears before the
appointing authority or his or her designee, excluding the day of the appearance, the
cabinet head or agency or his or her designee shall:
Page 15 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(a) Determine whether to dismiss the employee or to modify or rescind the intent
to dismiss; and
(b) Notify the employee in writing of the decision.
(7) If the appointing authority or his or her designee determines that the employee shall
be dismissed, the employee shall be notified in writing of:
(a) The effective date of his or her dismissal;
(b) The specific reason for the dismissal, including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the dismissal is based;
3. The date and place of the action or activity; and
4. The names of the parties involved; and
(c) That he or she may appeal the dismissal to the board within thirty (30)
calendar days after receipt of this notification, excluding the day he or she
receives notice.
(8) A classified employee with status who is demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred shall be notified in writing of:
(a) The demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer;
(b) The effective date of the demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer;
(c) The specific reason for the demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer,
including:
1. The statutory, regulatory, or policy violation;
2. The specific action or activity on which the demotion, suspension, or
involuntary transfer is based;
3. The date and place of the action or activity; and
4. The names of the parties involved; and
(d) That he or she has the right to appeal to the board within thirty (30) calendar
days, excluding the day that he or she received notification of the personnel
Page 16 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
action.
(9) Any unclassified employee who is dismissed, demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred for cause may, within thirty (30) calendar days after the
dismissal, demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer, appeal to the board for
review thereof.
(10) (a) An employee whose position is reallocated or reclassified to a lower grade
shall be notified in writing by the appointing authority of:
1. The reallocation or reclassification; and
2. [If the reallocation or reclassification is to a lower grade, ]His or her
right to request reconsideration by the secretary within ten (10) working
days of receipt of the notice, excluding the day he or she receives
notification.
(b) The employee shall file a written request for reconsideration of the
reallocation or reclassification to a lower grade with the secretary in a manner
and form prescribed by the secretary and shall be given a reasonable
opportunity to be heard by the secretary. The secretary shall make a
determination within sixty (60) calendar days after the request has been filed
by an employee. The secretary's determination shall be final and shall not be
appealable to the Personnel Board.
(11) (a) Any applicant, classified employee, or federally funded time-limited
employee may appeal to the board an action alleged to be based on
discrimination due to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, age
forty (40) and above, or any other category protected under state or federal
civil rights laws. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude any
applicant, classified employee, or unclassified employee from filing with the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights a complaint alleging discrimination
on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, disability, or age in
Page 17 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
accordance with KRS Chapter 344.
(b) Appeals alleging discrimination shall be filed within thirty (30) calendar days
after the alleged discriminatory action occurred.
(12) (a) Any applicant for classified employment under KRS Chapter 18A who has
been notified by the Personnel Cabinet that he or she did not meet the
minimum qualifications for a position may request reconsideration from the
secretary not more than ten (10) calendar days after the notification was sent.
The secretary's review and determination of the reconsideration shall be
completed within ten (10) calendar days from the receipt of the request for
reconsideration. The secretary's determination shall be final and shall not be
appealable to the Personnel Board.
(b) Any applicant for employment in a classified position under KRS Chapter
18A may appeal the hiring agency's nonselection based on an alleged
violation of appointment and promotion provisions contained in this chapter
or administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter to the board. The
appeal shall be filed not later than thirty (30) calendar days after the notice of
nonselection was mailed or sent electronically.
(13) When an employee who qualifies for a position has his or her name removed from
the register, the employee may petition the secretary for the opportunity to be heard
by the secretary or his or her designee. The petition shall be delivered to the
secretary in writing or electronically no later than ten (10) calendar days after the
removal notification has been sent. The secretary's decision shall be final and not
appealable to the Personnel Board.
(14) (a) Appeals to the board shall be in writing on an appeal form prescribed by the
board. The Personnel Board shall be responsible for the distribution of these
forms.
(b) The appeal form shall be attached to any notice of dismissal, demotion,
Page 18 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
suspension, or involuntary transfer. The appeal form shall instruct the
employee to state whether he or she is a classified or unclassified employee,
his or her full name, his or her appointing authority, work station address and
telephone number, home address and personal telephone number, personal
email address, and, if he or she has retained counsel at the time he or she files
an appeal, the name, address, and telephone number of his or her attorney.
(c) The form shall also instruct a classified employee to state the action he or she
is appealing in a short, plain, concise statement of the facts. The form shall
instruct an unclassified employee to make a short, plain, concise statement of
the reason for the appeal and the cause given for his or her dismissal,
demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer.
(d) The appellant[Any appeal form filed by a classified or unclassified employee]
shall identify the statute, administrative regulation, or policy that the
agency[was] allegedly violated on the appeal form.
(e) Upon receipt of the appeal by the board, the appointing authority and the
Personnel Cabinet shall be notified and the board shall schedule a hearing.
(15) All administrative hearings conducted by the board shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(16) (a) The board shall deny a hearing to an employee who has failed to file an
appeal within the time prescribed by this section; and to an unclassified
employee who has failed to state the reasons for the appeal and the cause for
which he or she has been dismissed, demoted, suspended without pay, or
involuntarily transferred. The board shall deny any appeal after a preliminary
hearing if it lacks jurisdiction to grant relief. The board shall notify the
employee of its denial in writing and shall inform the employee of his or her
right to appeal the denial under the provisions of KRS 18A.100.
(b) Any investigation by the board of any matter related to an appeal filed by an
Page 19 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
employee shall be conducted only upon notice to the employee, the
employee's counsel, and the appointing authority. All parties to the appeal
shall have access to information produced by the investigations and the
information shall be presented at the hearing.
(17) Each appeal shall be decided individually, unless otherwise agreed by the parties
and the board. The board shall not:
(a) Employ class action procedures; or
(b) Conduct test representative cases.
(18) Board members shall abstain from public comment about a pending or impending
proceeding before the board. This shall not prohibit board members from making
public statements in the course of their official duties or from explaining for public
information the procedures of the board.
(19) An appeal to the board may be heard by the full board or one (1) or more of the
following: its executive director, its general counsel, any nonelected member of the
board, or any hearing officer secured by the board pursuant to KRS 13B.030.
(20) (a) If the board finds that the action complained of was taken by the appointing
authority in violation of laws prohibiting favor for, or discrimination against,
or bias with respect to, his or her political or religious opinions or affiliations
or ethnic origin, or in violation of laws prohibiting discrimination because of
such individual's sex or age or disability, the appointing authority shall
immediately reinstate the employee to his or her former position or a position
of like status and pay, without loss of pay for the period of time at issue, or
otherwise make the employee whole unless the order is stayed by the board or
the court on appeal.
(b) If the board finds that the action complained of was taken without just cause,
the board shall order the immediate reinstatement of the employee to his or
her former position or a position of like status and pay, without loss of pay for
Page 20 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
the period of time at issue, or otherwise make the employee whole unless the
order is stayed by the board or the court on appeal.
(c) If the board finds that the action taken by the appointing authority was
excessive or erroneous in view of all the surrounding circumstances, the board
shall direct the appointing authority to modify or rescind the action at issue.
(d) In all other cases, the board shall direct the appointing authority to rescind the
action taken or otherwise grant specific relief or dismiss the appeal.
(21) If a final order of the board is appealed, a court may award reasonable attorney fees
to an employee who prevails by a final adjudication on the merits as provided by
KRS 453.260. This award shall not include attorney fees attributable to the hearing
before the board.
(22) When any employee is dismissed and not ordered reinstated after the appeal, the
board in its discretion may direct that his or her name be placed on an appropriate
reemployment list for employment in any similar position other than the one from
which he or she had been removed.
(23) After a final decision has been rendered by the board or court, an employee who
prevails in his or her appeal may be credited with the amount of leave time used for
time spent at his or her hearing before the board or court. Employees who had an
insufficient amount of leave time shall be credited with leave time equal to the
amount of time spent at their hearings before the board or court.
(24) If the appointing authority appeals the final order of the board, unless the board
rules otherwise, the reinstated employee shall remain in his or her former position,
or a position of like status or pay, until the conclusion of the appeals process, at
which time the appointing authority shall take action in accordance with the court
order.
(25) After a final decision in a contested case has been rendered by the last
administrative or judicial body to which the case has been appealed, the board shall
Page 21 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
make the decision available to the public in electronic format on its website and
shall organize the decisions according to the statutory basis for which the appeal
was based.
(26) Appeals concerning dismissals of classified employees with status shall take
precedence for hearings before the board over all other appeals.
(27) Any classified or unclassified employee as defined in KRS 18A.005 who is not
restored to a position pursuant to KRS 61.371 to 61.377, or who is dismissed
without cause within one (1) year after reinstatement, may appeal to the Personnel
Board. The appeal shall be filed in writing with the executive director of the board
not later than thirty (30) days after the notification of the action in question has
been mailed or sent electronically.
(28) If an individual received a notice that does not comply with subsection (7)(c),
(8)(d), or (14)(b) of this section, or received no written or electronic notification of
his or her dismissal, demotion, suspension, or involuntary transfer pursuant to
subsection (7) or (8) of this section, he or she shall file his or her appeal to the
board within one hundred eighty (180) days of:
(a) Receipt of the written notice, if he or she received a written notice that does
not comply with subsection (7)(c), (8)(d), or (14)(b) of this section; or
(b) The alleged act, if he or she did not receive written or electronic notification
of the alleged act in question.
(29) If a classified or unclassified employee refuses or fails to cooperate as a witness in
an agency, Personnel Cabinet, or board investigation, hearing, proceeding, or
inquiry, the employee may be subject to disciplinary action.
(30) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, the board shall not have jurisdiction over
any appeal except as authorized by this section.
Section 7. KRS 18A.100 is amended to read as follows:
Any party aggrieved by a final order of the board may appeal by filing a petition with
Page 22 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.[(1) Any
final order of the board either upholding or invalidating the dismissal, demotion, or
suspension of a classified or an unclassified employee may be appealed either by the
employee or by the appointing authority.
(2) The party aggrieved may appeal a final order by filing a petition with the clerk of
the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.]
Section 8. KRS 18A.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the
classified service governing:
(a) Applications and examinations;
(b) Certification and selection of eligibles;
(c) Classification and compensation plans;
(d) Incentive programs;
(e) [Layoffs;
(f) ]Registers;
(f)[(g)] Types of appointments;
(g)[(h)] Attendance; hours of work; compensatory time; annual, court, military,
sick, voting, living organ donor, and special leaves of absence, provided that
the secretary shall not promulgate administrative regulations that would
reduce the rate at which employees may accumulate leave time below the rate
effective on December 10, 1985; and
(h)[(i)] Employee evaluations.
(2) The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the
unclassified service.
(3) (a) Except as provided by KRS 18A.355, the secretary shall not promulgate
administrative regulations that would reduce an employee's salary; and
(b) As provided by KRS 18A.0751(4)(d)[(e)], the secretary may submit a
Page 23 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
proposed administrative regulation providing for an initial probationary period
in excess of six (6) months to the board for its approval.
(4) The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations to implement state
government's affirmative action plan under KRS 18A.138.
(5) The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations to implement
scholarship programs, internship programs, education programs, and
educational assistance programs.
(6) The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations for the classified
service governing layoffs, furloughs, and reduction of hours, including but not
limited to reemployment of laid-off employees.
(7)[(5)] (a) The administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of this
chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, and shall have the force and effect of law after
compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A and the
procedures adopted thereunder;
(b) Administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary shall not expand or
restrict rights granted to, or duties imposed upon, employees and
administrative bodies by the provisions of this chapter; and
(c) No administrative body other than the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate
administrative regulations governing the subject matters specified in this
section.
(8)[(6)] Prior to filing an administrative regulation with the Legislative Research
Commission, the secretary shall submit the administrative regulation to the board
for review.
(a) The board shall review the administrative regulation proposed by the secretary
not less than twenty (20) days after its submission to it;
(b) Not less than five (5) days after its review, the board shall submit its
recommendations in writing to the secretary;
Page 24 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(c) The secretary shall review the recommendations of the board and may revise
the proposed administrative regulation if he or she deems it necessary; and
(d) After the secretary has completed the review provided for in this section, he or
she may file the proposed administrative regulation with the Legislative
Research Commission pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
(9)[(7)] The administrative regulations shall provide:
(a) For the preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification plan
for all positions in the classified service, based upon similarity of duties
performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may
reasonably be required for, and the same schedule of pay may be equitably
applied to, all positions in the same class. The secretary shall allocate the
position of every employee in the classified service to one (1) of the classes in
the plan. The secretary shall reallocate existing positions, after consultation
with appointing authorities, when it is determined that they are incorrectly
allocated, and there has been no substantial change in duties from those in
effect when such positions were last classified. The occupant of a position
being reallocated shall continue to serve in the reallocated position with no
reduction in salary;
(b) For a pay plan for all employees in the classified service, after consultation
with appointing authorities and the state budget director. The plan shall take
into account such factors as:
1. The relative levels of duties and responsibilities of various classes of
positions;
2. Rates paid for comparable positions elsewhere taking into consideration
the effect of seniority on such rates; and
3. The state's financial resources.
Amendments to the pay plan shall be made in the same manner. Each
Page 25 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
employee shall be paid at one (1) of the rates set forth in the pay plan for the
class of position in which he or she is employed, provided that the full amount
of the annual increment provided for by the provisions of KRS 18A.355, and
the full amount of an increment due to a promotion, salary adjustment,
reclassification, or reallocation, shall be added to an employee's base salary or
wages;
(c) For the advertisement and acceptance of applications for at least five (5) days
for those positions to be filled by classified appointment or promotion. The
secretary may continue to receive applications and review applicants on a
continuous basis long enough to ensure a sufficient number of applicants;
(d) For the rejection of candidates or eligibles who fail to comply with reasonable
requirements of the secretary in regard to such factors as age, physical
condition, training, and experience, or who have attempted any deception or
fraud in connection with an examination;
(e) Except as provided by this chapter, for the appointment of a person whose
score is included in the five (5) highest scores earned on the examination;
(f) For annual, sick, and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or
reduced pay, after approval by the Governor as provided by KRS
18A.155(1)(d);
(g) [For layoffs, in accordance with the provisions of KRS 18A.113, by reasons
of lack of work, abolishment of a position, a material change in duties or
organization, or a lack of funds;
(h) ]For the development and operation of programs to improve the work
effectiveness of employees in the state service, including training, whether in-
service or compensated educational leave, safety, health, welfare, counseling,
recreation, employee relations, and employee mobility without written
examination;
Page 26 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(h)[(i)] For a uniform system of annual employee evaluation for classified
employees, with status, that shall be considered in determining eligibility for
discretionary salary advancements, promotions, and disciplinary actions. The
administrative regulations shall:
1. Require the secretary to determine the appropriate number of job
categories to be evaluated and a method for rating each category;
2. Provide for periodic informal reviews during the evaluation period
which shall be documented on the evaluation form and pertinent
comments by either the employee or supervisor may be included;
3. Establish a procedure for internal dispute resolution with respect to the
final evaluation rating;
4. [Permit a classified employee, with status, who receives either of the
two (2) lowest possible evaluation ratings to appeal to the Personnel
Board for review after exhausting the internal dispute resolution
procedure. The final evaluation shall not include supervisor comments
on ratings other than the lowest two (2) ratings;
5. ]Require that an employee who receives the highest possible rating shall
receive the equivalent of two (2) workdays, not to exceed sixteen (16)
hours, credited to his or her annual leave balance. An employee who
receives the second highest possible rating shall receive the equivalent
of one (1) workday, not to exceed eight (8) hours, credited to his or her
annual leave balance; and
5.[6.] Require that an employee who receives the lowest possible evaluation
rating shall either be demoted to a position commensurate with the
employee's skills and abilities or be terminated; and
(i)[(j)] For other administrative regulations not inconsistent with this chapter
and KRS Chapter 13A, as may be proper and necessary for its enforcement.
Page 27 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(10)[(8)] For any individual hired or elected to office before January 1, 2015, and paid
through the Kentucky Human Resources Information System, the Personnel
Cabinet shall not require payroll payments to be made by direct deposit or require
the individual to use a web-based program to access his or her salary statement.
(11)[(9)] To the extent that KRS 16.010 to 16.199, 16.080, and 16.584 and
administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police under authority granted in KRS Chapter 16 conflict with this
section or any administrative regulation promulgated by the secretary pursuant to
authority granted in this section, the provisions of KRS Chapter 16 shall prevail.
Section 9. KRS 18A.113 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Furlough" or "reduction in hours" means the temporary reduction of hours an
employee is scheduled to work by the appointing authority within a pay
period; and
(b) "Layoff" means discharge of employment subject to the rights contained in
this section.
(2) An appointing authority shall have the authority to layoff or furlough employees or
reduce hours of employment for any of the following reasons:
(a) Lack of funds or budgetary constraints;
(b) A reduction in spending authorization;
(c) Lack of work;
(d) Abolishment of a position;
(e) Efficiency; or
(f) Other material change in duties or organization.
(3) The appointing authority shall determine the classifications affected, the number of
employees laid off in each classification, and each county to which a layoff applies.
In the same department or office, county, and job classification, intern or interim
Page 28 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
and probationary employees shall be terminated[laid off] before full-time or part-
time employees with status are laid off. For purposes of layoff, "probationary
employee" shall not include an employee with status serving a promotional
probation.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to federally funded time-limited
employees.
(5) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall approve all actions taken under
subsection (2) of this section and no such layoff, furlough, or reduction of hours
may begin until the approval has been granted. The appointing authority, with the
approval of the secretary, shall have the authority to determine the extent, effective
dates, and length of any action taken under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) In determining a layoff, the appointing authority shall consider all employees under
the same appointing authority, within the classification affected, and within the
county affected. Consideration shall be given to the following relevant factors and
in this order:
(a) Job performance evaluations;
(b) Education, training, and experience;
(c) Disciplinary record; and
(d) Seniority.
(7) Any classified employee with status whose position is subject to layoff, furlough, or
reduction of hours shall be provided written notice containing the reason for the
action at least thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date of the action.
(8) (a) Any classified employee with status who is laid off shall be eligible to apply
as a reemployment applicant for the job classification from which he or she
was laid off, in the cabinet from which he or she was laid off for a period of
two (2) years. A reemployment applicant shall be hired before any applicant
except another reemployment applicant with greater seniority who is on the
Page 29 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
same register.
(b) A reemployment applicant shall not be removed from any register except as
provided in KRS 18A.032.
(c) When a reemployment applicant is removed from a register, he or she shall be
notified in writing or electronically and shall have the right to appeal to the
board within thirty (30) calendar days after receipt of the notification,
excluding the day he or she receives notice.
(d) A reemployment applicant who accepts any classified position, or who retires
through the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System, shall cease to have eligibility rights as a reemployment
applicant.
(9) With the approval of the secretary, the Personnel Cabinet may place employees
subject to a reduction in workforce in a different position.
(10) [The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A to fully implement the provisions of this section.
(11) ]A layoff, furlough, or reduction of hours implemented in accordance with this
section shall not be appealable to the Personnel Board.
Section 10. KRS 18A.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The classified service to which KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200, 18A.202, and 18A.203
[shall ]apply shall consist of[comprise] all positions in the state service now
existing or hereafter established, except the following:
(a) The General Assembly and employees of the General Assembly, including the
employees of the Legislative Research Commission;
(b) Officers elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in
elective offices;
(c) Members and employees of boards and commissions, except that the board
and commission members may elect to employ staff subject to KRS 18A.005
Page 30 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
to 18A.200, 18A.202, and 18A.203;
(d) Officers and employees on the staff of the Governor, the Lieutenant
Governor, the Office of the Secretary of the Governor's Cabinet, and the
Office of Program Administration;
(e) Cabinet secretaries, commissioners, office heads, and the administrative heads
of all boards and commissions, including the executive director of Kentucky
Educational Television;
(f) Employees of Kentucky Educational Television who have been determined to
be exempt from classified service by the Kentucky Authority for Educational
Television, which shall have sole authority over such exempt employees for
employment, dismissal, and setting of compensation, up to the maximum
established for the executive director and his or her principal assistants;
(g) One (1) principal assistant or deputy for each person exempted under
subsection (1)(e) of this section;
(h) 1. One (1) additional principal assistant or deputy as may be necessary for
making and carrying out policy for each person exempted under
subsection (1)(e) of this section in those instances in which the nature of
the functions, size, or complexity of the unit involved are such that the
secretary approves such an addition on petition of the relevant cabinet
secretary or department head and such other principal assistants,
deputies, or other major assistants as may be necessary for making and
carrying out policy for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e) of
this section in those instances in which the nature of the functions, size,
or complexity of the unit involved are such that the board may approve
such an addition or additions on petition of the department head
approved by the secretary.[ Effective August 1, 2010:
1. All positions approved under this paragraph prior to August 1, 2010,
Page 31 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
shall be abolished effective December 31, 2010, unless reapproved
under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and]
2. A position approved under this paragraph[ on or after August 1, 2010,]
shall be approved for a period of five (5) years, after which time the
position shall be abolished unless reapproved under this subparagraph
for an additional five (5) year period;
(i) Division directors subject to the provisions of KRS 18A.170. Division
directors in the classified service as of January 1, 1980, shall remain in the
classified service;
(j) Physicians employed as such;
(k) One (1) private secretary for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e),
(g), and (h) of this section;
(l) The judicial department, referees, receivers, jurors, and notaries public;
(m) Officers and members of the staffs of state universities and colleges and
student employees of such institutions; officers and employees of the
Teachers' Retirement System; and officers, teachers, and employees of local
boards of education;
(n) Patients or inmates employed in state institutions;
(o) Persons employed in a professional or scientific capacity to make or conduct a
temporary or special inquiry, investigation, or examination on behalf of the
General Assembly, or a committee thereof, or by authority of the Governor,
and persons employed by state agencies for a specified, limited period to
provide professional, technical, scientific, or artistic services under the
provisions of KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(p) Interim employees;
(q) Officers and members of the state militia;
(r) Department of Kentucky State Police troopers;
Page 32 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(s) University or college engineering students or other students employed part-
time or part-year by the state through special personnel recruitment programs;
provided that while so employed such aides shall be under contract to work
full-time for the state after graduation for a period of time approved by the
commissioner or shall be participants in a cooperative education program
approved by the commissioner;
(t) Superintendents of state mental institutions, including heads of centers for
individuals with an intellectual disability, [and ]penal and correctional
institutions as referred to in KRS 196.180(2), and all superintendents of
institutions for juveniles;
(u) Staff members of the Kentucky Historical Society, if they are hired in
accordance with KRS 171.311;
(v) County and Commonwealth's attorneys and their respective appointees;
(w) Chief district engineers and the state highway engineer;
(x) Veterinarians employed as such by the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming
Corporation;
(y) Employees of the Kentucky Peace Corps;
(z) Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(aa) Executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology;
(ab) Employees of Serve Kentucky;
(ac) Persons employed in certified teaching positions at the Kentucky School for
the Blind and the Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(ad) Federally funded time-limited employees as defined in KRS 18A.005; and
(ae) Employees of the Department of Agriculture who are employed to support the
Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance
Corporation.
(2) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 is intended, or shall be construed, to alter or
Page 33 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
amend the provisions of KRS 150.022 and 150.061.
(3) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 is intended or shall be construed to affect any
nonmanagement, nonpolicy-making position which must be included in the
classified service as a prerequisite to the grant of federal funds to a state agency.
(4) Career employees within the classified service promoted to positions exempted
from classified service shall, upon termination of their employment in the exempted
service, revert to a position in that class in the agency from which they were
terminated if a vacancy in that class exists. If no such vacancy exists, they shall be
considered for employment in any vacant position for which they were qualified
pursuant to KRS 18A.130 and 18A.135.
(5) Nothing in KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 shall be construed as precluding appointing
officers from filling unclassified positions in the manner in which positions in the
classified service are filled except as otherwise provided in KRS 18A.005 to
18A.200.
(6) The positions of employees who are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, from the
Cabinet for Workforce Development to the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall be abolished and the employees' names removed from the
roster of state employees. Employees that are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, to
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System under KRS Chapter 164
shall have the same benefits and rights as they had under KRS Chapter 18A and
have under KRS 164.5805; however, they shall have no guaranteed reemployment
rights in the KRS Chapter 151B or KRS Chapter 18A personnel systems. An
employee who seeks reemployment in a state position under KRS Chapter 151B or
KRS Chapter 18A shall have years of service in the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System counted towards years of experience for calculating
benefits and compensation.
(7) On August 15, 2000, all certified and equivalent personnel, all unclassified
Page 34 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
personnel, and all certified and equivalent and unclassified vacant positions in the
Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall be transferred from the
personnel system under KRS Chapter 151B to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. The positions shall be deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B personnel
system. All records shall be transferred including accumulated annual leave, sick
leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The
personnel officers who administer the personnel systems under KRS Chapter 151B
and KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative procedures to
effect the change in personnel authority. No certified or equivalent employee in the
Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall suffer any penalty in the
transfer.
(8) On August 15, 2000, secretaries and assistants attached to policymaking positions
in the Department for Technical Education and the Department for Adult Education
and Literacy shall be transferred from the personnel system under KRS Chapter
151B to the personnel system under KRS Chapter 18A. The positions shall be
deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B system. All records shall be transferred
including accumulated annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, and service
credit for each affected employee. No employee shall suffer any penalty in the
transfer.
(9) On May 1, 2017, all contract employees of Eastern Kentucky University who are
engaged in providing instructional and support services to the Department of
Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. All records shall be transferred, including accumulated annual leave,
sick leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The
personnel officers who administer the personnel systems for Eastern Kentucky
University and under KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative
procedures to effect the change in personnel authority. No employee shall suffer
Page 35 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
any penalty in the transfer.
(10) On July 1, 2024, all employees of the Louisville and Jefferson County Public
Defender Corporation shall be transferred to the personnel system under KRS
Chapter 18A. Records of each employee's job classification, compensation, dates of
employment, dates of professional licensure, probationary status, accumulated leave
balances by category, months of service, and any other information necessary under
KRS Chapter 18A shall be transferred. The personnel officers who administer the
personnel systems for the Louisville and Jefferson County Public Defender
Corporation and under KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary
administrative procedures to effect the change in the personnel authority. No
employee shall suffer any penalty in the transfer.
Section 11. KRS 18A.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No disbursing or auditing officer of the Commonwealth shall make or approve or
take any part in making or approving any payment for personal service to any
person holding a position in the classified or unclassified service unless the payroll
voucher or account of such pay bears the certification of the secretary, or of his
authorized agent, that the persons named therein have been appointed and employed
in accordance with the provisions of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 and the rules,
regulations, and orders thereunder. The secretary may for proper cause or upon
order of the board withhold certification from an entire payroll or from any specific
item or items thereon. The secretary may, however, provide that certification of
payrolls may be made once every six (6) months, and such certification shall remain
in effect except in the case of any officer or employee whose status has changed
after the last certification of his payroll. In the latter case no voucher for payment of
salary to such employee shall be issued or payment of salary made without the
further certification of the secretary.
(2) All agencies and employees for which the cabinet administers payroll shall
Page 36 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
comply with the secretary's payroll administration policies, procedures, and
requirements.
(3) Any citizen, including public officers, may maintain a suit to restrain a disbursing
officer from making any payment in contravention of any provision of KRS
18A.005 to 18A.200, or of any rule, regulation or order thereunder. Any sum paid
contrary to any provision of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200 or of any rule, regulation, or
order thereunder may be recovered in an action maintained by any citizen, from any
officer who made, approved, or authorized such payment or who signed or
countersigned a voucher, payroll check or warrant for such payment, or from the
sureties on the official bond of any such officer. All moneys recovered in any such
action shall be paid into the Treasury.
(4)[(3)] Any person appointed or employed in contravention of any provision of KRS
18A.005 to 18A.200 or of any rule, regulation, or order thereunder, who performs
service for which he is not paid, may maintain an action against the officer or
officers, employee or employees, who purported so to appoint or employ him, to
recover the agreed pay for such services, or the reasonable value thereof if no pay
was agreed upon. No such officer or employee shall be reimbursed by the
Commonwealth at any time for any sum paid to such person on account of such
services.
(5)[(4)] If the secretary wrongfully withholds certification of the payroll voucher or
account of any employee, such employee may maintain a proceeding in the Circuit
Court in the county in which he resides to compel the secretary to certify such
payroll voucher or account.
(6) An executive branch agency for which the cabinet administers payroll shall not
authorize performance of duties or provision of services from a work station or
alternative work station outside the Commonwealth of Kentucky without approval
from the secretary.
Page 37 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an agency may
request that the secretary deduct the value of the following items from an
employee's final paycheck, if the deduction is expressly authorized in writing by
the employee, and the deduction does not reduce the employee's pay below the
federal minimum wage:
(a) Unreturned equipment, tools, phones, laptops, or uniforms; and
(b) Training attendance and travel costs, if the employee terminates the
employment relationship with the agency within two (2) years of the
completion of the training.
Section 12. KRS 18A.135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any career employee who has been laid-off or dismissed, other than for cause, and,
in the case of an unclassified management employee, resignation other than
resignation in lieu of dismissal for cause, shall automatically be placed on the
reemployment list for the class from which he was terminated. If a career employee
wishes to be on the reemployment list for other classes of positions for which he or
she is qualified and passes the appropriate selection method, he shall notify the
cabinet in writing.
(2) If more than one (1) career employee requests to be placed on the reemployment list
for any job classification, the cabinet shall list the names of such career employees
in the order of their seniority.
(3) No vacancy may be filled from a competitive register until all career employees on
the reemployment list for that class of position have denied employment in that
class. An appointing authority may refuse to reemploy a qualified employee on the
reemployment list only for cause. The secretary and the employee shall be
furnished with a written statement of the specific reasons for the refusal within ten
(10) days following the appointing authority's refusal. The employee may appeal
the appointing authority's action in accordance with KRS 18A.095 and 18A.100.
Page 38 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(4) Reemployment rights granted pursuant to this section shall expire:
(a) After two (2) years from the date of separation;
(b) Upon acceptance of any classified position; or
(c) Upon retirement through the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or
Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System.
Section 13. KRS 18A.197 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth of Kentucky sick leave sharing program is created. An
employee who has accrued a sick leave balance of more than seventy-five (75)
hours may request that the appointing authority of the agency for which the
employee works makes available for transfer a specified amount of his or her sick
leave balance to another named employee authorized to receive leave under
subsection (2) of this section. The employee may not request a transfer of an
amount of leave that would result in reducing his or her sick leave balance to less
than seventy-five (75) hours.
(2) An appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, may
permit an employee of the agency to receive leave under this section if:
(a) The employee or a member of his or her immediate family suffers from a
medically certified illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition
which has caused, or is likely to cause, the employee to go on leave for at
least ten (10) consecutive working days;
(b) The employee's need for absence and use of leave are certified by a licensed
practicing physician or advanced practice registered nurse;
(c) The employee has exhausted his or her accumulated sick leave, annual leave,
and compensatory leave balances; and
(d) The employee has complied with administrative regulations governing the use
of sick leave.
(3) The appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, shall
Page 39 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
determine the amount of leave, if any, which an employee within his or her agency
may receive under subsection (2) of this section. Transfers of leave shall not exceed
the amount requested by the recipient.
(4) Leave may be transferred from an employee of one (1) agency to an employee
within the same agency. With the approval of the secretary of personnel and of the
appointing authorities of both agencies, leave may be transferred from an employee
of one (1) agency to an employee of another state agency. The Personnel Cabinet
shall maintain records of leave transferred between employees and the utilization of
transferred leave.
(5) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall be
deemed a state employee and shall receive the same treatment with respect to
salary, wages and employee benefits.
(6) All salary and wage payments made to an employee while on leave transferred
under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the
leave.
(7) Any leave transferred under this section which remains unused shall be returned to
the employees who transferred the leave when the appointing authority finds that
the leave is no longer needed and will not be needed at a future time in connection
with the illness or injury for which the leave was transferred to an employee in his
agency.
(8) No employee shall directly or indirectly intimidate, threaten, or coerce, or attempt
to intimidate, threaten, or coerce any other employee for the purpose of interfering
with the employee's right to voluntarily contribute leave when authorized under this
section. For the purpose of this subsection, "intimidate, threaten, or coerce" shall
include, without being limited to, the promise to confer or the conferring of any
benefit or effecting or threatening to effect any reprisal.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an employee who has provided
Page 40 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
proper notice of resignation or retirement may request transfer of all or part of
his or her remaining sick leave balance.
(10) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate procedural administrative
regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 14. KRS 18A.203 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth of Kentucky annual leave sharing program is created. An
employee who has accrued an annual leave balance of more than seventy-five (75)
hours may request that the appointing authority of the agency for which the
employee works makes available for transfer a specified amount of his or her
annual leave balance to another named employee authorized to receive leave under
subsection (2) of this section. The employee may not request a transfer of an
amount of leave that would result in reducing his or her annual leave balance to less
than seventy-five (75) hours.
(2) An appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, may
permit an employee of the agency to receive leave under this section if:
(a) The employee suffers from a catastrophic loss to his or her personal property,
due to either a natural disaster or fire, that either has caused or will likely
cause the employee to go on leave for at least ten (10) consecutive working
days;
(b) The employee has exhausted his or her accumulated annual leave and
compensatory leave balances; and
(c) The employee has complied with administrative regulations governing the use
of annual leave.
(3) The appointing authority, with the approval of the secretary of personnel, shall
determine the amount of leave, if any, that an employee within his or her agency
may receive under subsection (2) of this section. Transfers of leave shall not exceed
the amount requested by the recipient.
Page 41 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(4) Leave may be transferred from an employee of one (1) agency to an employee
within the same agency. With the approval of the secretary of personnel and of the
appointing authorities of both agencies, leave may be transferred from an employee
of one (1) agency to an employee of another state agency. The Personnel Cabinet
shall maintain records of leave transferred between employees and the utilization of
transferred leave.
(5) While an employee is on leave transferred under this section, he or she shall be
deemed a state employee and shall receive the same treatment with respect to
salary, wages, and employee benefits.
(6) All salary and wage payments made to an employee while on leave transferred
under this section shall be made by the agency employing the person receiving the
leave.
(7) Any leave transferred under this section that remains unused shall be returned to the
employees who transferred the leave when the appointing authority finds that the
leave is no longer needed and will not be needed at a future time in connection with
the catastrophic loss for which the leave was transferred to an employee in his or
her agency.
(8) No employee shall directly or indirectly intimidate, threaten, or coerce, or attempt
to intimidate, threaten, or coerce any other employee for the purpose of interfering
with the employee's right to voluntarily contribute leave when authorized under this
section. For the purpose of this subsection, "intimidate, threaten, or coerce" shall
include, without being limited to, the promise to confer or the conferring of any
benefit or effecting or threatening to effect any reprisal.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an employee who has provided
proper notice of resignation or retirement may request transfer of all or part of
his or her remaining annual leave balance.
(10) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate procedural administrative
Page 42 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 15. KRS 18A.355 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An annual increment of not less than five percent (5%) of the base salary or wages
of each state employee shall be granted to each employee on his or her anniversary
date. The employee's base salary or wages shall be increased by the amount of the
annual increment. When any increment due to a promotion, reallocation,
reclassification or salary adjustment is granted an employee, the employee's base
salary or wages shall be increased by the amount of such increment. An employee's
base salary or wages shall not be increased by the amount of lump-sum payment
awarded under KRS 18A.110(9)(h)[(7)(i)].
(2) The branch budget recommendation submitted to the General Assembly under KRS
Chapter 48 shall include a request for the amount of the annual increment expressed
as a percentage of each employee's base salary or wages and a request for the total
appropriation needed to fund the annual increment. The annual increment shall be
uniform for all employees. The financial plan enacted under the provisions of KRS
48.300 shall contain the annual increment expressed as a percentage of each
employee's base salary or wages, and the total appropriation needed to fund the
annual increment.
(3) The budget reduction plan submitted and enacted under the provisions of KRS
Chapter 48 shall provide that a reduction of the annual increment granted under this
section shall be made only after other cost savings measures, as provided by KRS
18A.113 are taken. Any such reduction shall be uniform for all state employees and
shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 48.
Section 16. KRS 132.370 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a property valuation administrator in each county in lieu of a county
assessor. Property valuation administrators shall be state officials and all deputies
and assistants of their offices shall be unclassified state employees.
Page 43 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
(2) Property valuation administrators shall be elected in the year in which county
elections are held and shall enter upon the discharge of the duties of their office on
the first Monday in December after their election and continue in office for a period
of four (4) years, and until the election and qualification of their successors.
Property valuation administrators shall possess the qualifications required by
Section 100 of the Constitution and by KRS 132.380 and shall be eligible for
reelection.
(3) The property valuation administrators and all deputies and assistants of their offices
who qualify as full-time employees shall be eligible for participation in the
provisions of KRS 18A.205, 18A.230 to 18A.355, and 61.510 to 61.705.
(4) A property valuation administrator may be removed from office by the Circuit
Court of his or her county, upon petition of any taxpayer, or by the commissioner of
revenue for willful disobedience of any just or legal order of the department, or for
misfeasance or malfeasance in office or willful neglect in the discharge of his or her
official duties, including but not limited to intentional underassessment or
overassessment of properties and chronic underassessment of properties. For
purposes of this section and KRS 133.250, "chronic underassessment" means a
widespread pattern and practice of assessing properties at levels substantially below
fair market value which persists for a period of two (2) or more years as disclosed
by randomly selected sample appraisals conducted under the provisions of KRS
133.250, special audits conducted pursuant to KRS 133.250, or other means.
(5) If the commissioner determines that a property valuation administrator should be
removed from office, the property valuation administrator shall be notified in
writing, and the notice of intent to remove shall state the specific reasons for
removal. The notice shall also advise the property valuation administrator of his or
her right to a preremoval conference and an administrative hearing.
(6) A property valuation administrator may request a preremoval conference to appear
Page 44 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
with or without counsel before the commissioner or his or her designee to answer
the charges against him or her. The preremoval conference shall be requested in
writing within six (6) working days of the date on which the notice of intent to
remove is received, and a preremoval conference shall be scheduled within seven
(7) working days of the date on which the request is received. The commissioner or
his or her designee shall render a decision within five (5) working days of the
conclusion of the preremoval conference. Failure of a property valuation
administrator to request a preremoval hearing shall not waive his or her right to
contest his or her removal through an administrative hearing.
(7) If an action to remove a property valuation administrator is initiated by the
commissioner of revenue, the property valuation administrator shall have the right
to appeal and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Appeal of the final order of the commissioner
of revenue may be filed in a Circuit Court of an adjacent judicial circuit in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS Chapter
18A.
(8) If a property valuation administrator is removed from office as provided in
subsections (4) to (7) of this section, he or she shall be ineligible to serve in the
office at any future date and shall forfeit any and all certification from the
Department of Revenue pertaining to the office.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 18A.110(7)[(5)](c), the department shall
promulgate administrative regulations allowing property valuation administrators
and their deputies to receive lump-sum payments for accrued annual leave and
compensatory time when separated from employment because of termination by the
employer, resignation, retirement, or death.
Section 17. KRS 163.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education, with assistance from the Kentucky
Page 45 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
Personnel Cabinet, shall adopt a salary schedule for teachers in the Kentucky
School for the Deaf and the Kentucky School for the Blind. The salary schedule
shall be the same as salary schedules in effect in local school districts in counties
containing a city of the first class and shall conform to the requirements for a single
salary schedule as defined in KRS 157.320, except the salary schedule shall not
limit the number of years of experience for a certified employee who transfers to
the school.
(2) (a) Certified teachers in the Kentucky School for the Deaf and the Kentucky
School for the Blind shall have the same statutory employment status and
benefits as certified teachers in the public schools.
(b) If a teacher qualifies for and requests a tribunal under KRS 161.790, the
Attorney General shall appoint the members.
(3) Once a teacher has been selected for hiring at the Kentucky School for the Blind or
the Kentucky School for the Deaf, the Department of Education and the Personnel
Cabinet shall complete the hiring process within two (2) weeks.
(4) A certified teacher employed at one (1) of the schools on July 12, 2006, whose job
description does not include outreach responsibilities shall not be involuntarily
assigned to work on a permanent basis outside the county in which the employing
school is located.
(5) Nothing in KRS 18A.115 or 163.032 shall result in a loss of any leave accrued by a
certified teacher employed prior to July 12, 2006, by one (1) of the schools.
Accrued leave may be taken in accordance with the policy of the school.
(6) The Kentucky Department of Education, with assistance from the Kentucky
Personnel Cabinet, shall adopt a salary schedule for administrators for the Kentucky
School for the Deaf and the Kentucky School for the Blind. In considering the rate
of pay and the requirements of KRS 18A.110(9)[(7)](b), the department and the
cabinet shall consider rates that are based upon the duties and responsibilities of the
Page 46 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 79/GA
positions and that are competitive with rates for similar or comparable services in
Kentucky school districts. The salary schedule, which shall be computed prior to
September 1 of each year, shall be based on two hundred sixty (260) days per year.
Page 47 of 47
SB007910.100 - 935 - XXXX 2/21/2025 8:53 AM GA